District of Columbia statutes.
9-107.01

Authority to provide payments and services.

For the purpose of enabling the District of Columbia to have its federal-aid highway projects approved under § 106 or 117 of Title 23, United States Code, the Mayor of the District of Columbia may, in connection with the acquisition of real property in the District of Columbia for any federal-aid highway project, provide the payments and services described in §§ 505, 506, 507, and 508 of Title 23, United States Code.

Aug. 23, 1968, 82 Stat. 827, Pub. L. 90-495, § 23(d)
Housing redevelopment, relocation assistance, see § 6-333.01.
1981 Ed., § 7-134.
1973 Ed., § 7-135.
For temporary establishment, on an emergency basis due to Congressional review, the District of Columbia Highway Trust Fund to comply with the requirement for the creation of a dedicated highway fund mandated by the D.C. Emergency Highway Relief Act, see § 2 of the Highway Trust Fund Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-47, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2103).
For temporary authority of the Mayor to issue rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of the act, see § 3 of the Highway Trust Fund Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-47, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2103).
Sections 505, 506, 507, and 508 of Title 23, United States Code, referred to at the end of this section, related to relocation payments and assistance, and were a part of Chapter 5 of Title 23. That chapter was repealed January 2, 1971, by § 220(a)(10) of the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, Pub. L. 91-646.

Appropriations authorized: Public Law 103-334, 108 Stat. 2581, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1995, provided for construction projects $5,600,000, as authorized by §§ 34-2405.01 through 34-2405.08; §§ 34-2413.08 and 34-2413.10; including acquisition of sites, preparation of plans and specifications, conducting preliminary surveys, erection of structures, including building improvement and alteration and treatment of grounds, to remain available until expended: Provided, That $140,000 shall be available for project management and $110,000 shall be available for design by the Director of the Department of Public Works or by contract for architectural engineering services, as may be determined by the Mayor: Provided further, That funds for use of each capital project implementing agency shall be managed and controlled in accordance with all procedures and limitations established under the Financial Management System: Provided further, That all funds provided by this appropriation title shall be available only for the specific projects and purposes intended: Provided further, That notwithstanding the foregoing, all authorizations for capital outlay projects, except those projects covered by the first sentence of section 23(a) of the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1968, approved August 23, 1968 (82 Stat. 827; Public Law 90-495; D.C. Code, sec. 7-134, note), for which funds are provided by this appropriation title, shall expire on September 30, 1996, except authorizations for projects as to which funds have been obligated in whole or in part prior to September 30, 1996: Provided further, That upon expiration of any such project authorization the funds provided herein for the project shall lapse.

Appropriations authorized: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2362, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided for construction projects an increase of $46,923,000 (including an increase of $34,000,000 for the highway trust fund, reallocations and rescissions for a net rescission of $120,496,000 from local funds appropriated under this heading in prior fiscal years and an additional $133,419,000 in Federal funds), as authorized by §§ 34-2405.01 through 34-2405.08; §§ 34-2413.08, 34-2413.10 and 34-2304; and §§ 10-619 and 47-3404; including acquisition of sites, preparation of plans and specifications, conducting preliminary surveys, erection of structures, including building improvement and alteration and treatment of grounds, to remain available until expended: Provided, That funds for use of each capital project implementing agency shall be managed and controlled in accordance with all procedures and limitations established under the Financial Management System: Provided further, That all funds provided by this appropriation title shall be available only for the specific projects and purposes intended: Provided further, That notwithstanding the foregoing, all authorizations for capital outlay projects, except those projects covered by the first sentence of section 23(a) of the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1968, approved August 23, 1968 (82 Stat. 827; Public Law 90-495; D.C. Code, sec. 9-107.01, note), for which funds are provided by this appropriation title, shall expire on September 30, 1998, except authorizations for projects as to which funds have been obligated in whole or in part prior to September 30, 1998: Provided further, That upon expiration of any such project authorization the funds provided herein for the project shall lapse.

Federal-Aid Highway Memorandum of Agreement Council Chairman Emergency Resolution of 1996: Pursuant to Resolution 11-374, effective June 4, 1996, Council directed, on an emergency basis, the Chairman, on behalf of the Council, to sign a memorandum of Agreement to Establish a Federal-Aid Highway Pilot Program at the Department of Public Works.

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.